el: Πρότυπο πιστοποίησης σωσιβίου: AS 4758 Level 100; AS 4758 Level 50; Με πιστοποίηση CE; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); Transport Canada Level 70; USCG Type I; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; Άλλο
cs: Norma pro certifikaci záchranných vest: AS 4758 Level 100; AS 4758 Level 50; Certifikace CE; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); Transport Canada Level 70; USCG typ I; USCG typ II; USCG typ III; USCG typ V; Jiné
sl-SI: Standard za certificiranje na področju varnosti za rešilne jopiče: AS 4758 Level 100; AS 4758 Level 50; Certifikat CE; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); Transport Canada Level 70; USCG Type I; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; Drugo
lt-LT: Gelbėjimosi liemenių sertifikavimo standartas: AS 4758, 100 lygis; AS 4758, 50 lygis; Sertifikuota CE; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); „Transport Canada“, 70 lygis; USCG, I tipas; USCG, II tipas; USCG, III tipas; USCG, V tipas; Kita
sk-SK: Certifikačná norma záchrannej vesty: AS 4758 úroveň 100; AS 4758 úroveň 50; Certifikát CE; ISO 12402-3 (150 N); ISO 12402-5 (50 N); Transport Canada úroveň 70; USCG typ I; USCG typ II; USCG typ III; USCG typ V; Iné
es: Estándar de certificación del chaleco salvavidas: AS 4758 nivel 100; AS 4758 nivel 50; Con certificación CE; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); Nivel 70 de Transport Canada; USCG tipo I; USCG tipo II; USCG tipo III; USCG tipo V; Otro
th: มาตรฐานการรับรองเสื้อชูชีพ: AS 4758 ระดับ 100; AS 4758 ระดับ 50; ผ่านการรับรองมาตรฐาน CE; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); Transport Canada ระดับ 70; USCG ประเภท I; USCG ประเภท II; USCG ประเภท III; USCG ประเภท V; อื่นๆ
pl: Norma certyfikacji kamizelki ratunkowej: AS 4758 poziom 100; AS 4758 poziom 50; Certyfikat CE; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); Transport Canada poziom 70; USCG typ I; USCG typ II; USCG typ III; USCG typ V; Inne
hr-HR: Standard certificiranja prsluka za spašavanje: AS 4758 razina 100; AS 4758 razina 50; CE certifikat; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); Transport Canada razina 70; USCG tip I; USCG tip II; USCG tip III; USCG tip V; Ostalo
hu: Mentőmellény tanúsítási szabványa: AS 4758 100-as szint; AS 4758 50-es szint; CE-tanúsítvánnyal rendelkező; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); Transport Canada 70-es szint; USCG I. típus; USCG II. típus; USCG III. típus; USCG V. típus; Egyéb
de: Zertifizierungsstandard für Rettungswesten: AS 4758 Level 100; AS 4758 Level 50; CE-zertifiziert; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); Transport Canada Level 70; USCG Typ I; USCG Typ II; USCG Typ III; USCG Typ V; Sonstige
zh-CN: 救生衣认证标准: AS 4758 100 级; AS 4758 50 级; CE 认证; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); 加拿大交通部 70 级; USCG I 型; USCG II 型; USCG III 型; USCG V 型; 其他
ko: 구명조끼 인증 표준: AS 4758 레벨 100; AS 4758 레벨 50; CE 인증; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); Transport Canada 레벨 70; USCG 유형 I; USCG 유형 II; USCG 유형 III; USCG 유형 V; 기타
pt-BR: Norma de certificação do colete salva-vidas: AS 4758 Nível 100; AS 4758 Nível 50; Certificado CE; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); Transport Canada Nível 70; USCG Tipo I; USCG Tipo II; USCG Tipo III; USCG Tipo V; Outro
pt-PT: Norma de certificação do coletes salva-vidas: AS 4758 nível 100; AS 4758 nível 50; Com certificação CE; ISO 12402-3 (150 N); ISO 12402-5 (50 N); Transport Canada nível 70; USCG tipo I; USCG tipo II; USCG tipo III; USCG tipo V; Outro
da: Standard for certificering af redningsveste: AS 4758 niveau 100; AS 4758 niveau 50; CE-certificeret; ISO 12402-3 (150 N); ISO 12402-5 (50 N); Transport Canada niveau 70; USCG type I; USCG type II; USCG type III; USCG type V; Andet
it: Standard di certificazione del giubbotto di salvataggio: AS 4758 livello 100; AS 4758 livello 50; Certificazione CE; ISO 12402-3 (150 N); ISO 12402-5 (50 N); Transport Canada livello 70; USCG tipo I; USCG tipo II; USCG tipo III; USCG tipo V; Altro
vi: Tiêu chuẩn chứng nhận áo phao cứu sinh: AS 4758 Cấp độ 100; AS 4758 Cấp độ 50; Chứng nhận CE; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); Transport Canada Cấp độ 70; USCG Loại I; USCG Loại II; USCG Loại III; USCG Loại V; Khác
nl: Certificeringsnorm reddingsvesten: AS 4758 Level 100; AS 4758 Level 50; CE-gecertificeerd; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); Transport Canada Level 70; USCG Type I; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; Overige
en: Life jacket certification standard: AS 4758 Level 100; AS 4758 Level 50; CE certified; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); Transport Canada Level 70; USCG Type I; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; Other
ja: ライフジャケット認証標準: AS 4758 Level 100; AS 4758 Level 50; CE認証; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); カナダ運輸省 レベル70; USCG タイプI; USCG タイプII; USCG タイプIII; USCG タイプV; その他
fi: Pelastusliivin sertifiointiluokitus: AS 4758, taso 100; AS 4758, taso 50; CE-sertifioitu; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); Transport Canada, taso 70; USCG, tyyppi I; USCG, tyyppi II; USCG, tyyppi III; USCG, tyyppi V; Muu
tr: Can yeleği sertifikasyon standardı: AS 4758 Seviye 100; AS 4758 Seviye 50; CE sertifikalı; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); Transport Canada Seviye 70; USCG Tip I; USCG Tip II; USCG Tip III; USCG Tip V; Diğer
ru: Стандарт сертификации спасательного жилета: AS 4758, уровень 100; AS 4758, уровень 50; Сертификат CE; ISO 12402-3 (150 Н); ISO 12402-5 (50 Н); Transport Canada, уровень 70; USCG, тип I; USCG, тип II; USCG, тип III; USCG, тип V; Другое
ro-RO: Standard de certificare a vestei de salvare: AS 4758 Nivelul 100; AS 4758 Nivelul 50; Certificare CE; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); Nivelul 70 Transport Canada; Tipul I USCG; Tipul II USCG; Tipul III USCG; Tipul V USCG; Altele
sv: Certifieringsstandard för flytväst: AS 4758 nivå 100; AS 4758 nivå 50; CE-certifierad; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); Transport Canada nivå 70; USCG typ I; USCG typ II; USCG typ III; USCG typ V; Övrigt
zh-TW: 救生衣認證標準: AS 4758 100 級; AS 4758 50 級; CE 認證; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); 加拿大交通部 70 級; 美國海岸巡防隊 (USCG) 第 I 類; 美國海岸巡防隊 (USCG) 第 II 類; 美國海岸巡防隊 (USCG) 第 III 類; 美國海岸巡防隊 (USCG) 第 V 類; 其他
fr: Norme de certification des gilets de sauvetage: AS 4758 niveau 100; AS 4758 niveau 50; Certifié CE; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); Transports Canada niveau 70; USCG type I; USCG type II; USCG type III; USCG type V; Autre
bg-BG: Стандарт за сертификация на спасителна жилетка: AS 4758 Ниво 100; AS 4758 Ниво 50; CE сертификат; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); Transport Canada Ниво 70; USCG Тип I; USCG Тип II; USCG Тип III; USCG Тип V; Друг
nb: Sertifiseringsstandard for livvest: AS 4758 Level 100; AS 4758 Level 50; CE-sertifisert; ISO 12402-3 (150N); ISO 12402-5 (50N); Transport Canada Level 70; USCG Type I; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; Annet